New York, session 2025-2026, S7290.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a 2 new section 910 to read as follows: 3 § 910. Payments to class members. Any class action compromise or 4 settlement that has a monetary component to be paid to class members 5 shall include an option for such class members to be paid any monies 6 owed by deposit directly into a bank account of such class member. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11393-01-5